North Carolina statutes. Chapter 48A. Minors.
Article 1. Age of Majority.

§ 48A-1.
Common-law definition of “minor” abrogated.

The common-law definition of minor insofar as it pertains to the age of the minor is hereby repealed and abrogated.

History.

1971, c. 585, s. 1; 2003-207, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Contracts of Minors Viewed from the Perspective of Fair Exchange,” see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 517 (1972).

For survey of 1972 case law on child support and pre-Chapter 48A consent judgments, see 51 N.C.L. Rev. 1091 (1973).

§ 48A-2.
Age of minors.

A minor is any person who has not reached the age of 18 years.

History.

1971, c. 585, s. 1; 2003-207, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Contracts of Minors Viewed from the Perspective of Fair Exchange,” see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 517 (1972).

For article, “The Best Interests of the Child:
Article & Empirical Study:
It’s the Conflict, Stupid:
An Empirical Study of Factors that Inhibit Successful Medication in High-Conflict Custody Cases,” see 43 Wake Forest L. Rev. 505 (2008).

For article, “Minor’s Personal Injury Actions and Settlements in North Carolina,” see 34 Campbell L. Rev. 293 (2012).

For article, “One Size Only Fits Some: Presuming Custody for the Involuntarily Committed,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 1014 (2019).

§ 48A-3.
Statute of limitations; applicability.

For purposes of determining the applicability of the statute of limitations which has been tolled because of minority or for purposes of determining the applicable period of time for disaffirmance of a contract of a minor upon reaching majority, because of a change in applicable law occasioned by enactment of this Chapter or Chapter 1231 of the 1971 Session Laws, the following rules shall apply:

For those persons who were 21 on the effective date of applicable law, limitations shall apply as they would prior to amendment;

For those persons 18 years of age but not 21 on the effective date of applicable law, any time periods for disaffirmance or application of the statute of limitations shall run from the effective date of this Chapter, to wit, July 5, 1971.

For those persons not yet 18, any time periods for disaffirmance or application of the statute of limitations shall run from the person’s reaching age 18.

History.

1971, c. 1231, s. 3; 2003-207, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Contracts of Minors Viewed from the Perspective of Fair Exchange,” see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 517 (1972).

§ 48A-4.
Certain minors competent to contract.

A minor who is 16 years of age or older and who is in the legal custody of the county department of social services shall be qualified and competent to contract for the purchase of an automobile insurance policy with the consent of the court with continuing jurisdiction over the minor’s placement under G.S. 7B-1000(b). The minor shall be responsible for paying the costs of the insurance premiums and shall be liable for damages caused by the minor’s negligent operation of a motor vehicle. No State or local government agency, foster parent, or entity providing services to the minor under contract or at the direction of a State or local government agency shall be responsible for paying any insurance premiums or liable for damages of any kind as a result of the operation of a motor vehicle by the minor.

History.

2015-135, s. 4.1.

§§ 48A-5 through 48A-10.

Reserved for future codification purposes.